Utah statutes.
78B-3-308.   Change of venue -- Conditions precedent.
If the county in which the action is commenced is not the proper county for
the trial, the action may nevertheless be tried in the county in which it is
filed, unless the defendant, at the time the answer is filed or an appearance
is made, files a written motion requesting the trial be moved to the proper
county.
